Mississippi statutes. Title 89. Real and Personal Property
Article 1. Outdoor Recreational Land.

§ 89-2-1.
Declaration of purpose; effect of opening property for outdoor recreational purposes.

The purpose of this article is to encourage persons to make available to the public land and water areas for outdoor recreational purposes. A lessee or owner who opens a land or water area to the public for outdoor recreational purposes shall not, by opening such land or water for such use:

Be presumed to extend any assurance that such land or water area is safe for any purpose;

Incur any duty of care toward a person who goes on the land or water area; or

Become liable or responsible for any injury to persons or property caused by the act or omission of a person who goes on the land or water area.

The foregoing applies, whether the person going on the land or water area is an invitee, licensee, trespasser or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 488, § 1(1), eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 89-2-3.
Definitions.

The term “outdoor recreational purposes” as used in this article shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking, hiking, pleasure driving, nature study, water skiing and visiting historical, archaeological, scenic or scientific sites.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 488, § 1(3), eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 89-2-5.
Certain liability not limited.

This article does not relieve any person of liability which would otherwise exist for deliberate, willful or malicious injury to persons or property. The provisions hereof shall not be deemed to create or increase the liability of any person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 488, § 1(2), eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 89-2-7.
Application of article.

The provisions of this article shall not apply if any fee is charged for entering or using any part of such land or water outdoor recreational area, or if any concession is operated on said area offering to sell or selling any item or product to persons entering thereon for recreational purposes. Said article shall not apply unless public notice of the availability of such lands for such public use shall have been published once annually in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such lands are situated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.